FOMA_Scripts/fullgerman.lexc
LEXICON NNeut/Sg_es
Blut    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Business    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Business    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Emd    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Geheiss    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Gemüse    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Glück    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Gold    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Heil    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Heu    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Indiz    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Leid    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Malz    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Mark    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Missgeschick    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Missgeschick    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Nass    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Obdach    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Obst    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Privileg    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Sandwich    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Umland    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Unverständnis    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Weh    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Wild    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Zink    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Zinn    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;
Malz    NNeut/Sg_esSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut/Sg_esSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:^e #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^es #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^es #;

LEXICON NNeut/Sg_sSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;

LEXICON NNeut_0_x
Dessous    NNeut_0_xSPinf;
Etwas    NNeut_0_xSPinf;
Gros    NNeut_0_xSPinf;
Hertz    NNeut_0_xSPinf;
Lux    NNeut_0_xSPinf;
Megahertz    NNeut_0_xSPinf;
Minus    NNeut_0_xSPinf;
Newton    NNeut_0_xSPinf;
Palais    NNeut_0_xSPinf;
Pence    NNeut_0_xSPinf;
Pick    NNeut_0_xSPinf;
Pik    NNeut_0_xSPinf;
Pils    NNeut_0_xSPinf;
Prozedere    NNeut_0_xSPinf;
Quiz    NNeut_0_xSPinf;
Remis    NNeut_0_xSPinf;
Rendezvous    NNeut_0_xSPinf;
Revers    NNeut_0_xSPinf;
Riess    NNeut_0_xSPinf;
Ries    NNeut_0_xSPinf;
Schwarz    NNeut_0_xSPinf;
Service    NNeut_0_xSPinf;
Stelldichein    NNeut_0_xSPinf;
Val    NNeut_0_xSPinf;
Aus    NNeut_0_xSPinf;
Newton    NNeut_0_xSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut_0_xSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:0 #;

LEXICON NNeut_es_$e
Floss    NNeut_es_$eSPinf;
Giftzahn    NNeut_es_$eSPinf;
Giftzahn NNeut_es_$eSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut_es_$eSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:e #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^es #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:+um^e #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:+um^e #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:+um^en #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:+um^e #;

LEXICON NNeut_es_$erSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:e #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^es #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:+um^er #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:+um^er #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:+um^ern #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:+um^er #;

LEXICON NNeut_es_eSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:e #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^es #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:^e #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:^e #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:^en #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:^e #;

LEXICON NNeut_es_en
Bett    NNeut_es_enSPinf;
Etikett    NNeut_es_enSPinf;
Gatt    NNeut_es_enSPinf;
Gatt    NNeut_es_enSPinf;
Hemd    NNeut_es_enSPinf;
Insekt    NNeut_es_enSPinf;
Juwel    NNeut_es_enSPinf;
Ohr    NNeut_es_enSPinf;
Schott    NNeut_es_enSPinf;
Skript    NNeut_es_enSPinf;
Statut    NNeut_es_enSPinf;
Verb    NNeut_es_enSPinf;
Insekt    NNeut_es_enSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut_es_enSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:e #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^es #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:^en #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:^en #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:^en #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:^en #;

LEXICON NNeut_es_er
Abbild    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Angesicht    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Biest    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Bild    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Brett    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Damoklesschwert    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Ding    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Feld    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Geld    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Gemüt    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Geschlecht    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Gesicht    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Gespenst    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Glied    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Ährenfeld    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Kind    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Kleid    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Licht    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Lid    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Lied    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Lösegeld    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Magnetfeld    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Mitglied    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Nest    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Nordlicht    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Regiment    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Reis    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Rind    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Scheit    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Schild    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Schmerzensgeld    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Schwert    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Umfeld    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Viech    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Vorbild    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Vorfeld    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Weib    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Zwielicht    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Ei    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Osterei    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Ei    NNeut_es_erSPinf;
Kind    NNeut_es_erSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut_es_erSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:e #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^es #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:^er #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:^er #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:^ern #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:^er #;

LEXICON NNeut_s_$
Abwasser    NNeut_s_$SPinf;
Kloster    NNeut_s_$SPinf;
Wasser    NNeut_s_$SPinf;
Kloster NNeut_s_$SPinf;

LEXICON NNeut_s_$SPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:+um^ #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:+um^ #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:+um^n #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:+um^ #;

LEXICON NNeut_s_0SPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:^n #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:0 #;

LEXICON NNeut_s_eSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:^e #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:^e #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:^en #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:^e #;

LEXICON NNeut_s_en
Chromosom    NNeut_s_enSPinf;
Elektron    NNeut_s_enSPinf;
Fresko    NNeut_s_enSPinf;
Kation    NNeut_s_enSPinf;
Melodram    NNeut_s_enSPinf;
Mosaik    NNeut_s_enSPinf;
Neutron    NNeut_s_enSPinf;
Prion    NNeut_s_enSPinf;
Proton    NNeut_s_enSPinf;
Quant    NNeut_s_enSPinf;
Requisit    NNeut_s_enSPinf;
Symposion    NNeut_s_enSPinf;
Melodram    NNeut_s_enSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut_s_enSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:^en #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:^en #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:^en #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:^en #;


LEXICON NNeut_s_n
Auge    NNeut_s_nSPinf;
Dirndl    NNeut_s_nSPinf;
Ende    NNeut_s_nSPinf;
Interesse    NNeut_s_nSPinf;
Mandl    NNeut_s_nSPinf;
Pickerl    NNeut_s_nSPinf;
Stockerl    NNeut_s_nSPinf;
Volksinteresse    NNeut_s_nSPinf;
Wochenende    NNeut_s_nSPinf;
Wochenende    NNeut_s_nSPinf;

LEXICON NNeut_s_nSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:^n #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:^n #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:^n #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:^n #;


LEXICON NNeut_s_sSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:^s #;

LEXICON NNeut_s_xSPinf
+Neut+NN+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Sg:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Sg:^s #;
+Neut+NN+Nom+Plural:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Acc+Plural:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Dat+Plural:0 #;
+Neut+NN+Gen+Plural:0 #;

LEXICON NNeut/Sg_s
Alu    NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;
Arabisch    NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;
Banking    NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;
Bestehen    NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;
Charisma    NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;
Deutsch    NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;
Englisch    NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;
Federvieh    NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;
Grauen    NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;
Heroin    NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;
Kalzium    NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;
Latein    NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;
Material    NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;
Mobbing    NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;
Opium    NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;
Plasstik    NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;
Prestige    NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;
Röntgen    NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;
Semifinale    NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;
Stadion    NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;
Textil    NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;
Uran    NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;
Vorhandensein    NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;
Wohlgefallen    NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;
Tein    NNeut/Sg_sSPinf;
LEXICON NNeut_es_$er
Arbeitsamt    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;
Band    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;
Blatt    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;
Bussgeld    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;
Dach    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;
Dorf    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;
Erzbistum    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;
Fahrrad    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;
Gesetzbuch    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;
Glas    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;
Gras    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;
Haupt    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;
Holz    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;
Hospital    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;
Kalb    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;
Krankenhaus    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;
Kreuzband    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;
Lamm    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;
Loch    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;
Maul    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;
Passwort    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;
Rathaus    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;
Spital    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;
Treibhaus    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;
Volk    NNeut_es_$erSPinf;
LEXICON NNeut_es_e
Aspirin    NNeut_es_eSPinf;
Ausmass    NNeut_es_eSPinf;
Benefiz    NNeut_es_eSPinf;
Blei    NNeut_es_eSPinf;
Cholesterin    NNeut_es_eSPinf;
Ding    NNeut_es_eSPinf;
Element    NNeut_es_eSPinf;
Exponat    NNeut_es_eSPinf;
Gas    NNeut_es_eSPinf;
Geleit    NNeut_es_eSPinf;
Gespräch    NNeut_es_eSPinf;
Heer    NNeut_es_eSPinf;
Institut    NNeut_es_eSPinf;
Komplott    NNeut_es_eSPinf;
Laufwerk    NNeut_es_eSPinf;
Meer    NNeut_es_eSPinf;
Oxid    NNeut_es_eSPinf;
Pferd    NNeut_es_eSPinf;
Pseudonym    NNeut_es_eSPinf;
Riff    NNeut_es_eSPinf;
Sediment    NNeut_es_eSPinf;
Subjekt    NNeut_es_eSPinf;
Verdienst    NNeut_es_eSPinf;
Ziel    NNeut_es_eSPinf;
LEXICON NNeut_s_0
Übel    NNeut_s_0SPinf;
Debakel    NNeut_s_0SPinf;
Exempel    NNeut_s_0SPinf;
Feuer    NNeut_s_0SPinf;
Gebilde    NNeut_s_0SPinf;
Gefüge    NNeut_s_0SPinf;
Gefolge    NNeut_s_0SPinf;
Gelächter    NNeut_s_0SPinf;
Gemetzel    NNeut_s_0SPinf;
Gerangel    NNeut_s_0SPinf;
Getöse    NNeut_s_0SPinf;
Gewölbe    NNeut_s_0SPinf;
Hilfsmittel    NNeut_s_0SPinf;
Kapitel    NNeut_s_0SPinf;
Knie    NNeut_s_0SPinf;
Laster    NNeut_s_0SPinf;
Manöver    NNeut_s_0SPinf;
Mittel    NNeut_s_0SPinf;
Opfer    NNeut_s_0SPinf;
Pflaster    NNeut_s_0SPinf;
Poster    NNeut_s_0SPinf;
Register    NNeut_s_0SPinf;
Seidel    NNeut_s_0SPinf;
Trinkwasser    NNeut_s_0SPinf;
Zepter    NNeut_s_0SPinf;
LEXICON NNeut_s_e
Amphetamin    NNeut_s_eSPinf;
Arsenal    NNeut_s_eSPinf;
Chemierevier    NNeut_s_eSPinf;
Dutzend    NNeut_s_eSPinf;
Fossil    NNeut_s_eSPinf;
Genom    NNeut_s_eSPinf;
Gewehr    NNeut_s_eSPinf;
Honorar    NNeut_s_eSPinf;
Jahrzehnt    NNeut_s_eSPinf;
Klavier    NNeut_s_eSPinf;
Landgericht    NNeut_s_eSPinf;
Memorial    NNeut_s_eSPinf;
Monopol    NNeut_s_eSPinf;
Original    NNeut_s_eSPinf;
Portal    NNeut_s_eSPinf;
Prinzip    NNeut_s_eSPinf;
Quintett    NNeut_s_eSPinf;
Reservoir    NNeut_s_eSPinf;
Schwefeldioxid    NNeut_s_eSPinf;
Spalier    NNeut_s_eSPinf;
Tausend    NNeut_s_eSPinf;
Trottoir    NNeut_s_eSPinf;
Visier    NNeut_s_eSPinf;
Ar    NNeut_s_eSPinf;
LEXICON NNeut_s_s
Air    NNeut_s_sSPinf;
Andante    NNeut_s_sSPinf;
Baby    NNeut_s_sSPinf;
Board    NNeut_s_sSPinf;
Café    NNeut_s_sSPinf;
Copyright    NNeut_s_sSPinf;
Design    NNeut_s_sSPinf;
Ego    NNeut_s_sSPinf;
Feuilleton    NNeut_s_sSPinf;
Genre    NNeut_s_sSPinf;
Hearing    NNeut_s_sSPinf;
Jackett    NNeut_s_sSPinf;
Klischee    NNeut_s_sSPinf;
Lamento    NNeut_s_sSPinf;
Maxi    NNeut_s_sSPinf;
Motto    NNeut_s_sSPinf;
Paroli    NNeut_s_sSPinf;
Pony    NNeut_s_sSPinf;
Rating    NNeut_s_sSPinf;
Rouge    NNeut_s_sSPinf;
Souvenir    NNeut_s_sSPinf;
Take    NNeut_s_sSPinf;
Tram    NNeut_s_sSPinf;
Ren    NNeut_s_sSPinf;
LEXICON NNeut_s_x
Andenken    NNeut_s_xSPinf;
Anzeichen    NNeut_s_xSPinf;
Balken    NNeut_s_xSPinf;
Becken    NNeut_s_xSPinf;
Besen    NNeut_s_xSPinf;
Brötchen    NNeut_s_xSPinf;
Eichhörnchen    NNeut_s_xSPinf;
Entsetzen    NNeut_s_xSPinf;
Füllen    NNeut_s_xSPinf;
Gefallen    NNeut_s_xSPinf;
Happen    NNeut_s_xSPinf;
Hoden    NNeut_s_xSPinf;
Kissen    NNeut_s_xSPinf;
Lastwagen    NNeut_s_xSPinf;
Leinen    NNeut_s_xSPinf;
Nachsehen    NNeut_s_xSPinf;
Partikel    NNeut_s_xSPinf;
Rasen    NNeut_s_xSPinf;
Samen    NNeut_s_xSPinf;
Schoppen    NNeut_s_xSPinf;
Streifen    NNeut_s_xSPinf;
Verfahren    NNeut_s_xSPinf;
Wappen    NNeut_s_xSPinf;
Zuckerl    NNeut_s_xSPinf;
